Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20143-159
Authorization to purchase new aircraft;
sale of aircraft.

The
Executive Board of the Legislative Council pursuant to the authority granted
in Laws 2013, LB194, section 9, commissioned an independent study to enable
the Legislature to determine whether the state should purchase or otherwise
acquire an aircraft for state purposes and what type of aircraft should be
acquired, if any. After completion and review of the study, the Legislature
authorizes the Department of Aeronautics to purchase a new aircraft. It is
the intent of the Legislature to fund the purchase with General Funds and
other funds. The Legislature also directs the department, upon taking possession
of a new aircraft, to sell the state's 1982 Piper Cheyenne aircraft, with
the proceeds retained by the department for use for preventive maintenance
funding for the new aircraft.

Laws 2014, LB1016, § 1.